Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1403.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1205.2(k) introductory paragraph and (2) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, are amended and the subsection is amended by adding paragraphs to read:Section 1205.2. Program of Continuing Professional and Paraprofessional Education.--* * *(k) A professional educator who is not employed by a school entity as a professional or temporary professional employe may apply to the department for inactive certification[.], which shall be granted by the department at no cost to the 12345678910111213141516171819 professional educator. Inactive certification shall:* * *(2) Except as provided under [paragraph] paragraphs (2.1) and (2.2), be removed by the department upon the application of the professional educator and evidence of the completion of thirty (30) hours of continuing professional education within the immediate preceding [twelve (12)] eighteen (18) months. The department shall establish guidelines to approve courses that will authorize the removal of inactive certification.* * *(2.2) Be removed by the department upon the application of the professional educator and evidence that the professional educator has received an offer of employment from a school entity that has committed to provide AND ENSURE THAT the professional educator with COMPLETES thirty (30) hours of in- service continuing professional education within the professional educator's first two school years of employment. (2.3) Upon the removal of inactive certification under paragraph (2.1) or (2.2), a professional educator shall have the same number of hours of continuing professional education and the same amount of time in which to complete the hours as existed for the professional educator at the time inactive certification was granted. In the case of a professional educator whose certificate was placed on inactive status by the department due to the expiration of the professional educator's compliance period, the professional educator shall begin a new five-year compliance period to satisfy the requirements of subsection (a).* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1403PN1685 - 2 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930